zh-CN: 达扬鼓面类型: 手工涂抹（传统）; 机器涂抹; 无黑斑 (syahi); 预制贴片; 印刷/喷漆; 其他
sv: Dayan syahi-typ: Handapplicerad (traditionell); Maskinapplicerad; Ingen syahi; Förformad lapp; Tryckt/målad; Övrigt
th: ประเภทของย่านจุดดำ (Syahi) บนหน้ากลองดายัน: ติดด้วยมือ (ดั้งเดิม); ติดด้วยเครื่องจักร; ไม่มี Syahi; แผ่นแปะขึ้นรูปสำเร็จ; พิมพ์ลาย/ทาสี; อื่นๆ
sl-SI: Vrsta syahi za dayan: Ročno nanešeno (tradicionalno); Strojno nanešeno; Brez syahija; Vnaprej oblikovana zaplata; Natisnjeno/barvano; Drugo
lt-LT: Dayan syahi tipas: Uždėta rankomis (tradicinė); Uždėta mašina; Be sjahi; Iš anksto suformuotas lopas; Atspausdinta / nudažyta; Kita
nl: Dayan syahi type: Met de hand aangebracht (traditioneel); Machinaal aangebracht; Geen syahi; Voorgevormde patch; Gedrukt/geschilderd; Overige
hu: Dayan syahi típusa: Kézzel felvitt (hagyományos); Géppel felvitt; Nincs syahi; Előformázott folt; Nyomtatott/festett; Egyéb
tr: Dayan syahi tipi: Elde uygulanmış (geleneksel); Makine ile uygulanmış; Syahi yok; Önceden şekillendirilmiş yama; Baskılı/boyalı; Diğer
ko: 다얀 샤히 유형: 수작업(전통식); 기계 작업; 샤히 없음; 사전 성형 패치; 인쇄/도색; 기타
fr: Type de syahi pour dayan: Appliqué à la main (traditionnel); Appliqué à la machine; Sans syahi; Pièce préformée; Imprimé/peint; Autre
vi: Loại syahi của trống dayan: Phết thủ công (truyền thống); Phết bằng máy; Không có syahi; Miếng dán định hình sẵn; In/sơn; Khác
de: Art der Dayan-Syahi: Handaufgetragen (traditionell); Maschinell aufgetragen; Kein Syahi; Vorgeformter Patch; Gedruckt/gemalt; Sonstige
ro-RO: Tipul de syahi dayan: Aplicat manual (tradițional); Aplicat mecanic; Fără syahi; Petic preformat; Imprimat/vopsit; Altele
el: Τύπος Dayan syahi: Εφαρμοσμένο στο χέρι (παραδοσιακό); Εφαρμοσμένο με μηχάνημα; Χωρίς syahi; Προδιαμορφωμένο μπάλωμα; Τυπωμένο/βαμμένο; Άλλο
pl: Typ syahi dayanu: Nakładane ręcznie (tradycyjne); Nakładane maszynowo; Bez syahi; Gotowa łatka; Nadrukowane/namalowane; Inne
it: Tipo Dayan syahi: Applicato a mano (tradizionale); Applicato a macchina; Senza syahi; Toppa preformata; Stampato/verniciato; Altro
zh-TW: 達揚鼓 syahi 類型: 手工塗層 (傳統); 機器塗層; 無 Syahi 黑膠; 預製貼片; 印刷/彩繪; 其他
pt-PT: Tipo Dayan syahi: Aplicado à mão (tradicional); Aplicado à máquina; Sem syahi; Remendo pré-formado; Impresso/pintado; Outro
fi: Dayan-rummun syahityyppi: Käsin levitetty (perinteinen); Koneellisesti levitetty; Ei syahia; Valmiiksi muotoiltu paikka; Painettu/maalattu; Muu
hr-HR: Vrsta Dayan syahi: Ručno naneseno (tradicionalno); Strojno naneseno; Bez syahija; Unaprijed oblikovana zakrpa; Ispisano/obojano; Ostalo
en: Dayan syahi type: Hand-applied (traditional); Machine-applied; No syahi; Preformed patch; Printed/painted; Other
bg-BG: Тип сяхи на даяна: Ръчно нанесено (традиционно); Машинно нанесено; Без сях; Предварително оформена лепенка; Отпечатано/боядисано; Други
ja: ダヤンシャヒタイプ: 手塗り (伝統的); 機械塗り; シャヒなし; 成形済みパッチ; プリント/塗装; その他
ru: Тип сьяхи даяна: Нанесение вручную (традиционное); Машинное нанесение; Без сьяхи; Формованная накладка; Напечатанное/нарисованное; Другое
cs: Typ Dayan syahi: Ručně nanášený (tradiční); Strojově nanášený; Bez syahi; Předtvarovaná záplata; Potištěný/malovaný; Jiné
pt-BR: Tipo de syahi para dayan: Aplicado à mão (tradicional); Aplicado à máquina; Sem syahi; Remendo pré-formado; Impresso/pintado; Outro
da: Dayanens syahi-type: Håndpåført (traditionel); Maskinpåført; Ingen syahi; Forformet lap; Trykt/malet; Andet
nb: Dayan syahi-type: Håndpåført (tradisjonell); Maskinpåført; Uten syahi; Forhåndsformet lapp; Trykt/malt; Annet
es: Tipo de syahi de Dayan: Aplicado a mano (tradicional); Aplicado a máquina; Sin syahi; Parche preformado; Impreso/pintado; Otro
sk-SK: Typ ladiacej pasty syahi na bubon Dayan: Ručne aplikované (tradičné); Strojovo aplikované; Bez syahi; Predtvarovaná záplata; Potlačené/maľované; Iné